italian.aff
# particelle pronominali su ger.
flag *2:

    # flag *2:
    # potere
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendolo
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendola
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendoli
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendole
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendone
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendomi
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendoti
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendogli
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendoci
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendovi
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendosi
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendomelo
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendomela
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendomeli
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendomele
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendomene
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendomisi
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendotelo
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendotela
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendoteli
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendotele
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendotene
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendotisi
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendoglielo
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendogliela
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendoglieli
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendogliele
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendogliene
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendoglisi
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendocelo
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendocela
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendoceli
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendocele
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendocene
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendocisi
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendovelo
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendovela
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendoveli
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendovele
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendovene
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendovisi
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendoselo
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendosela
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendoseli
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendosele
    t e r e         >    -tere,ssendosene

    # flag *2:
    # nuocere
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendolo
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendola
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendoli
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendole
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendone
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendomi
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendoti
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendogli
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendoci
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendovi
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendosi
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendomelo
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendomela
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendomeli
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendomele
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendomene
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendomisi
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendotelo
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendotela
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendoteli
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendotele
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendotene
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendotisi
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendoglielo
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendogliela
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendoglieli
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendogliele
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendogliene
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendoglisi
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendocelo
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendocela
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendoceli
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendocele
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendocene
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendocisi
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendovelo
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendovela
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendoveli
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendovele
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendovene
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendovisi
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendoselo
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendosela
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendoseli
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendosele
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocendosene

    # flag *2:
    # bere, strabere
    b e r e         >    -re,vendolo
    b e r e         >    -re,vendola
    b e r e         >    -re,vendoli
    b e r e         >    -re,vendole
    b e r e         >    -re,vendone
    b e r e         >    -re,vendomi
    b e r e         >    -re,vendoti
    b e r e         >    -re,vendogli
    b e r e         >    -re,vendoci
    b e r e         >    -re,vendovi
    b e r e         >    -re,vendosi
    b e r e         >    -re,vendomelo
    b e r e         >    -re,vendomela
    b e r e         >    -re,vendomeli
    b e r e         >    -re,vendomele
    b e r e         >    -re,vendomene
    b e r e         >    -re,vendomisi
    b e r e         >    -re,vendotelo
    b e r e         >    -re,vendotela
    b e r e         >    -re,vendoteli
    b e r e         >    -re,vendotele
    b e r e         >    -re,vendotene
    b e r e         >    -re,vendotisi
    b e r e         >    -re,vendoglielo
    b e r e         >    -re,vendogliela
    b e r e         >    -re,vendoglieli
    b e r e         >    -re,vendogliele
    b e r e         >    -re,vendogliene
    b e r e         >    -re,vendoglisi
    b e r e         >    -re,vendocelo
    b e r e         >    -re,vendocela
    b e r e         >    -re,vendoceli
    b e r e         >    -re,vendocele
    b e r e         >    -re,vendocene
    b e r e         >    -re,vendocisi
    b e r e         >    -re,vendovelo
    b e r e         >    -re,vendovela
    b e r e         >    -re,vendoveli
    b e r e         >    -re,vendovele
    b e r e         >    -re,vendovene
    b e r e         >    -re,vendovisi
    b e r e         >    -re,vendoselo
    b e r e         >    -re,vendosela
    b e r e         >    -re,vendoseli
    b e r e         >    -re,vendosele
    b e r e         >    -re,vendosene

    # flag *2:
    # artefare, assuefare, benedire, confare, contraddire, contraffare, dire...
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendolo
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendola
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendoli
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendole
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendone
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendomi
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendoti
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendogli
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendoci
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendovi
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendosi
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendomelo
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendomela
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendomeli
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendomele
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendomene
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendomisi
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendotelo
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendotela
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendoteli
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendotele
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendotene
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendotisi
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendoglielo
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendogliela
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendoglieli
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendogliele
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendogliene
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendoglisi
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendocelo
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendocela
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendoceli
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendocele
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendocene
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendocisi
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendovelo
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendovela
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendoveli
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendovele
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendovene
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendovisi
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendoselo
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendosela
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendoseli
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendosele
    [ai] r e        >    -re,cendosene
